Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 4

General Partners

61-2-401. Additional partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership's initial certificate of limited partnership, unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, additional general partners may be admitted only with the approval of all partners.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 41.

61-2-402. When person ceases to be partner.

A person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in § 61-2-602;

The general partner ceases to be a general partner of the limited partnership as provided in § 61-2-702;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or with the approval of all partners, the general partner:

Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

Is adjudged bankrupt or insolvent, or has entered against him an order for relief in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding;

Files a petition or answer seeking for himself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation;

Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegations of a petition filed against him in any proceeding of this nature; or

Seeks, consents to or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties;

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or with the approval of all partners, one hundred twenty (120) days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within ninety (90) days after the appointment without his consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed, or within ninety (90) days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is a natural person:

His death; or

The entry by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating him incompetent to manage his person or his property;

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the substitution of a new trustee);

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the revocation of its charter and the expiration of ninety (90) days after the date of notice to the corporation of administrative dissolution or revocation without a reinstatement of its charter; or

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, or with the written consent of all partners in the case of a general partner that is an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate's entire interest in the limited partnership.

A general partner who suffers an event that with the passage of the specified period becomes an event of withdrawal under subdivisions (a)(4), (5) or (9) shall notify each other general partner, or in the event that there is no other general partner, each limited partner, of the occurrence of the event within thirty (30) days after the date of its occurrence.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 42-47.

61-2-403. Rights and powers — Liabilities.

Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this chapter, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-404. Contributions — Share of profits, etc.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the limited partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner, and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-405. Discharge of duties — Liability.

A general partner shall discharge his duties as a partner, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner he reasonably believes to be in the best interest of the partnership.

In discharging his duties, a general partner is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the partnership whom the general partner reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the general partner reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the partners of which he is not a member, if the general partner reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

The general partner is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

A general partner is not liable for any action taken as a partner, or any failure to take any action, if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-406. Conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the partnership in which a general partner of the partnership has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable by the partnership solely because of the general partner's interest in the transaction if any one (1) of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the general partner's interest were disclosed or known to all the general partners and the transaction is authorized, approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the general partners who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction may not be authorized, approved or ratified under this section by a single general partner;

The material facts of the transaction and the general partner's interest were disclosed or known to a committee of not less than three (3) partners, none of whom have a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and such committee authorized, approved or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and the general partner's interest were disclosed or known to all disinterested partners and a majority of such disinterested partners authorized, approved or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the partnership.

For purposes of this section, a general partner of the partnership has an indirect interest in a transaction if, but not only if, another entity in which he has a material financial interest or of which he is a director, officer, trustee or partner is a party to the transaction.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(3), votes of partners who have a direct or indirect interest in a transaction or votes of those under the control of an entity described in subsection (b), may not be counted in a vote of partners to determine whether to authorize, approve or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subdivision (a)(3). The votes of those partners, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this title. A majority of the partners, whether or not present, that are entitled to vote on the transaction under this subsection (c) constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.